Illinois, session 104th, HB4266.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 30-10 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/30-10)7    Sec. 30-10. Notice of meeting; agenda. 8    (a) Notice of the time and place of holding the annual and 9any special township meetings shall be given by the township 10clerk (or, in the clerk's absence, the supervisor, assessor, 11or collector) by posting written or printed notices in 3 of the 12most public places in the township at least 15 days before the 13meeting and, if there is an English language newspaper 14published in the township, by at least one publication in that 15newspaper before the meeting. The notice shall set forth the 16agenda for the meeting.17    A township that has a website that the full-time staff of 18the township maintains shall also post on its website the 19notice and agenda of the annual and any special township 20meetings. A notice and agenda of the annual or a special 21township meeting that is posted on a township's website shall 22remain posted on the website at least until the annual or 23special township meeting is concluded.   HB4266- 2 -LRB104 15588 RTM 28755 b1    (b) Agenda. Not less than 15 days before the annual 2meeting, the township board shall adopt an agenda for the 3annual meeting. Any 15 or more registered voters in the 4township may request an agenda item for consideration by the 5electors at the annual meeting by giving written notice of a 6specific request to the township clerk no later than March 1 7prior to the annual meeting. The agenda published by the 8township board shall include any such request made by voters 9if the request is relevant to powers granted to electors under 10the Township Code.11    (c) Additional agenda items. Any matter or proposal not 12set forth in the published agenda shall not be considered at 13the annual meeting other than advising that the matter may be 14considered at a special meeting of the electors at a later 15date. 16    (d) Notice and agenda requirements for an annual township 17meeting that has been postponed under subsection (d) of 18Section 30-5 shall be the same as provided in this Section. 19(Source: P.A. 101-632, eff. 6-5-20.)